Washington statutes.
RCW 35.42.080

Lease of city land for building purposes and lease back of building by city—Bids.

A lease and lease back agreement requiring a lessee to build on city or town property shall be made pursuant to a call for bids upon terms most advantageous to the city or town. The call for bids shall be given by posting notice thereof in a public place in the city or town and by publication in the official newspaper of the city or town once each week for two consecutive weeks before the date fixed for opening the bids. The city council or commission of the city or town may by resolution reject all bids and make further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call. If no bid is received on the first call, the city council or commission may readvertise and make a second call, or may execute a lease without any further call for bids.

[ 1985 c 469 s 28; 1965 c 7 s 35.42.080. Prior: 1959 c 80 s 8.]